Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 8. Notice to Absent Defendant; Writ of Review of Default Judgment Without Notice

§§ 911,
912.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 913.
Effect of service outside the State.

When process is served upon a party outside the State in such manner as the Supreme Court may by rule provide, the same proceedings may be had, so far as to affect the title or right to the possession of goods, chattels, rights, credits, land, tenements, or hereditaments in the State as if the process had been served on a party in the State.

Upon the service, and if it appears that the contact with the State by the party or the activity in the State by the party or the contact or activity imputable to him or her is sufficient to support a personal judgment against him or her, the same proceedings may be had for a personal judgment against him or her as if the process or pleading had been served on him or her in the State.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section are in addition to all existing manner of service, rights, and remedies, and the availability of a personal judgment by reason of subsection (b) shall make the provisions of sections 855, 856, 891 and 892 of this title and

11 V.S.A. § 1630

alternative and not inoperative.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 353

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 1968;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 914.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 915.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§§ 916-922.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.